Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,271
Enforcement of occupant protection system requirements; when.

Enforcement of section 60-6,270 by state or local law enforcement agencies shall be accomplished only as a secondary action when a driver of a motor vehicle has been cited or charged with a violation or some other offense.

Laws 1985, LB 496, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 958, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,103.05;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 367.